Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 1. Organization Trust Companies

§ 13-5-101.
Authority to organize; powers; limitations; prohibitions; exemptions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 69, 71, 75, 78; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-301, 10-303, 10-401, 10-404; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-301, 35-303, 35-401, 35-404; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-90, 13-92, 13-96, 13-98; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1979, ch. 34, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, § 2; 1995, ch. 85, § 1; 2015 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-102.
Formation. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 76; R.S. 1931, § 10-402; C.S. 1945, § 35-402; W.S. 1957, § 13-97; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, § 2; 2015 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-103.
Application for charter; fee. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, § 2; 2015 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-104.
Procedure for granting charter; failure to open for business. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1979, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, §§ 2, 3; ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-105.
Capital stock required; statement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 70; R.S. 1931, § 10-302; C.S. 1945, § 35-302; W.S. 1957, § 13-91; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, § 2; 2015 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-106.
Discontinuing trust business. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 13-5-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 51, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to loans to officers, directors, or principle shareholders of banks, see §

13-3-102

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1, related to restrictions on loans.

§ 13-5-108.
Laws applicable; matters of contract. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, § 2; 2003, ch. 124, § 2; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-401

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-109.
Financial transactions. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, § 2; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-409

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-110.
Powers of the commissioner. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 79; R.S. 1931, § 10-405; C.S. 1945, § 35-405; W.S. 1957, § 13-100; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, § 2; ch. 115, § 1; 1994, ch. 14, § 1; 1999, ch. 42, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 16, § 1; 2015 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-410

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-111.
Suspension or revocation of charter. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 51, § 1; 1999, ch. 42, § 2; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-415

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-112.
Continuing jurisdiction. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 51, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-416

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-113.
Insolvency; unsafe condition; receivership. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 51, § 1; 1999, ch. 42, § 2; 2015 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-417

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-114.
Order declaring trust company properly wound up and dissolved. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-418

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-115.
Surety bond; pledged investments; investment income; bond or pledge increases; hearings. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-413

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-116.
Voluntary dissolution of trust company; liquidation; reorganization; application for dissolution; filing fee; filing with secretary of state; revocation of charter. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-419

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-117.
Failure to submit required report; fees; regulations. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-412

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-118.
Willful neglect to perform duties imposed by law or failure to conform to material lawful requirement made by commissioner; removal. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-420

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.